Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.265

Preferences—Purchase of electronic products meeting environmental performance standards—Requirements for surplus electronic products.

(1) The department shall establish purchasing and procurement policies that establish a preference for electronic products that meet environmental performance standards relating to the reduction or elimination of hazardous materials.

(2) The department shall ensure that their surplus electronic products, other than those sold individually to private citizens, are managed only by registered transporters and by processors meeting the requirements of RCW 70A.500.250.

(3) The department shall ensure that their surplus electronic products are directed to legal secondary materials markets by requiring a chain of custody record that documents to whom the products were initially delivered through to the end use manufacturer.

[ 2021 c 65 s 27; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 229; 2006 c 183 s 36. Formerly RCW 43.19.539.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Construction—Effective date—2006 c 183: See RCW 70A.500.900 and 70A.500.901.